District of Columbia statutes.
31-4730

Operative dates of §§ 31-4725 through 31-4730.

(a)

(1)

Except as described in § 31-4727, §§ 31-4725 through 31-4730 apply to policy forms filed 2 years after March 14, 1985.

(2)

No form shall be used in the District of Columbia 5 years after March 14, 1985, unless the form complies with § 31-4725 or unless the Commissioner approves the form under § 31-4726.

(3)

(A)

A form permitted to be used before 5 years after March 14, 1985, and complying with § 31-4725 need not be refiled to be approved under either § 31-4725 or § 31-4726.

(B)

The forms described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph may be used in the District of Columbia after the company files with the Commissioner a list of the forms used by the company and qualifying for the subparagraph (A) exception, the form number for each form, and, for each form, the certificate described in § 31-4725(d).

(b)

For individual forms and in the discretion of the Commissioner, the Commissioner may extend the deadlines described in subsection (a) of this section.

History

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. V, § 30
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(h), 32 DCR 39
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 23(f), 45 DCR 745

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-4727.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-536.